dictionaries/tr/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4130 N 1
SFX 4130 0 yabiliyorlardı .
SFX 4133 N 1
SFX 4133 0 ıştırmışlar .
SFX 4132 N 1
SFX 4132 0 nilip .
SFX 4135 N 1
SFX 4135 0 ülebilmesi .
SFX 4134 N 1
SFX 4134 0 nilir .
SFX 4136 N 1
SFX 4136 0 ündekinin .
SFX 4137 N 1
SFX 4137 0 tirebilecekleri .
SFX 4138 N 1
SFX 4138 0 yabilecektir .
SFX 4140 N 1
SFX 4140 0 indesin .
SFX 4139 N 1
SFX 4139 0 lulardır .
SFX 4141 N 1
SFX 4141 0 dıracağından .
SFX 4142 N 1
SFX 4142 0 süydü .
SFX 4143 N 1
SFX 4143 0 cüyle .
SFX 4144 N 1
SFX 4144 0 laşabilirdi .
SFX 4145 N 1
SFX 4145 0 lemektir .
SFX 4146 N 1
SFX 4146 0 laşılmış .
SFX 4147 N 1
SFX 4147 0 diklerimden .
SFX 4148 N 1
SFX 4148 0 mişlere .
SFX 4149 N 1
SFX 4149 0 mişleri .
SFX 4152 N 1
SFX 4152 0 amamışım .
SFX 4151 N 1
SFX 4151 0 abilirseniz .
SFX 4150 N 1
SFX 4150 0 direceklerdi .
SFX 4154 N 1
SFX 4154 0 ülemediğinin .
SFX 4153 N 1
SFX 4153 0 yamamaktır .
SFX 4156 N 1
SFX 4156 0 yabildiğine .
SFX 4155 N 1
SFX 4155 0 ttuklarına .
SFX 4157 N 1
SFX 4157 0 amamışız .
SFX 4158 N 1
SFX 4158 0 denler .
SFX 4160 N 1
SFX 4160 0 ilemeyince .
SFX 4159 N 1
SFX 4159 0 larındanız .
SFX 4162 N 1
SFX 4162 0 yabildiğini .
SFX 4161 N 1
SFX 4161 0 uşamadıkları .
SFX 4164 N 1
SFX 4164 0 tirmemeli .
SFX 4163 N 1
SFX 4163 0 ıştırılmaları .
SFX 4165 N 1
SFX 4165 0 nabilmelerine .
SFX 4166 N 1
SFX 4166 0 ündekilerden .
SFX 4168 N 1
SFX 4168 0 yebildikleri .
SFX 4167 N 1
SFX 4167 0 nabilmelerini .
SFX 4169 N 1
SFX 4169 0 mediğimden .
SFX 4170 N 1
SFX 4170 0 larındanım .
SFX 4171 N 1
SFX 4171 0 laşıldığında .
SFX 4172 N 1
SFX 4172 0 tmesinden .
SFX 4174 N 1
SFX 4174 0 ınca .
SFX 4173 N 1
SFX 4173 0 eydi .
SFX 4175 N 1
SFX 4175 0 yıcısının .
SFX 4177 N 1
SFX 4177 0 dırdıkları .
SFX 4176 N 1
SFX 4176 0 tabiliyordu .
SFX 4178 N 1
SFX 4178 0 tirilmesinden .
SFX 4181 N 1
SFX 4181 0 ımlar .
SFX 4180 N 1
SFX 4180 0 sallıkla .
SFX 4179 N 1
SFX 4179 0 lanıyorken .
SFX 4182 N 1
SFX 4182 0 tilebileceği .
SFX 4183 N 1
SFX 4183 0 emesem .
SFX 4185 N 1
SFX 4185 0 arcasına .
SFX 4184 N 1
SFX 4184 0 şmazlıklarının .
SFX 4186 N 1
SFX 4186 0 emesek .
SFX 4187 N 1
SFX 4187 0 muşsundur .
SFX 4189 N 1
SFX 4189 0 tacakmış .
SFX 4188 N 1
SFX 4188 0 nilmesinin .
SFX 4190 N 1
SFX 4190 0 mayacaklarsa .
SFX 4191 N 1
SFX 4191 0 lenememiş .
SFX 4192 N 1
SFX 4192 0 tıranın .
SFX 4193 N 1
SFX 4193 0 mıştınız .
SFX 4194 N 1
SFX 4194 0 mediğinde .
SFX 4195 N 1
SFX 4195 0 laştırılamaması .
SFX 4196 N 1
SFX 4196 0 ındayız .
SFX 4197 N 1
SFX 4197 0 uşabileceği .
SFX 4198 N 1
SFX 4198 0 tılarak .
SFX 4200 N 1
SFX 4200 0 nmalarıyla .
SFX 4199 N 1
SFX 4199 0 malının .
SFX 4201 N 1
SFX 4201 0 amıyorlar .
SFX 4202 N 1
SFX 4202 0 tabilseydik .
SFX 4204 N 1
SFX 4204 0 enler .
SFX 4203 N 1
SFX 4203 0 eyiz .
SFX 4205 N 1
SFX 4205 0 tabileceğinin .
SFX 4206 N 1
SFX 4206 0 ununsa .
SFX 4207 N 1
SFX 4207 0 tılarının .
SFX 4208 N 1
SFX 4208 0 laşılmıştır .
SFX 4209 N 1
SFX 4209 0 yicinin .
SFX 4210 N 1
SFX 4210 0 ttükleri .
SFX 4211 N 1
SFX 4211 0 dırmalarına .
SFX 4212 N 1
SFX 4212 0 memelisin .
SFX 4213 N 1
SFX 4213 0 sininden .
SFX 4214 N 1
SFX 4214 0 tiremeyeceklerinden .
SFX 4215 N 1
SFX 4215 0 nilen .
SFX 4216 N 1
SFX 4216 0 turmadığını .
SFX 4217 N 1
SFX 4217 0 mamalarında .
SFX 4218 N 1
SFX 4218 0 lemeciliği .
SFX 4220 N 1
SFX 4220 0 ülmeleri .
SFX 4219 N 1
SFX 4219 0 laşıveriyor .
SFX 4221 N 1
SFX 4221 0 tıramazlar .
SFX 4222 N 1
SFX 4222 0 ştırılamadığından .
SFX 4223 N 1
SFX 4223 0 lemekten .
SFX 4224 N 1
SFX 4224 0 nmalarından .
SFX 4225 N 1
SFX 4225 0 ndikten .
SFX 4226 N 1
SFX 4226 0 ştırın .
SFX 4227 N 1
SFX 4227 0 nuzla .
SFX 4228 N 1
SFX 4228 0 nmemesine .
SFX 4229 N 1
SFX 4229 0 mazları .
SFX 4230 N 1
SFX 4230 0 ştırır .
SFX 4231 N 1
SFX 4231 0 nildi .
SFX 4233 N 1
SFX 4233 0 nmemesini .
SFX 4232 N 1
SFX 4232 0 ştırıp .
SFX 4234 N 1
SFX 4234 0 ününde .
SFX 4235 N 1
SFX 4235 0 mıza .
SFX 4236 N 1
SFX 4236 0 tmeyeceğine .
SFX 4237 N 1
SFX 4237 0 uklarını .
SFX 4238 N 1
SFX 4238 0 layamamasına .
SFX 4241 N 1
SFX 4241 0 ında .
SFX 4240 N 1
SFX 4240 0 eyim .
SFX 4239 N 1
SFX 4239 0 tmeyeceğini .
SFX 4243 N 1
SFX 4243 0 emeyeceklerdir .
SFX 4242 N 1
SFX 4242 0 tirebilecekler .
SFX 4244 N 1
SFX 4244 0 ştırılmadan .
SFX 4245 N 1
SFX 4245 0 yışım .
SFX 4248 N 1
SFX 4248 0 mişsinizdir .
SFX 4247 N 1
SFX 4247 0 yışın .
SFX 4246 N 1
SFX 4246 0 laştırmalara .
SFX 4250 N 1
SFX 4250 0 mmış .
SFX 4249 N 1
SFX 4249 0 lıklıların .
SFX 4251 N 1
SFX 4251 0 laştırdığın .
SFX 4253 N 1
SFX 4253 0 leştirilmiş .
SFX 4252 N 1
SFX 4252 0 mediğiniz .
SFX 4254 N 1
SFX 4254 0 laşabilecektir .
SFX 4255 N 1
SFX 4255 0 teydiler .
SFX 4257 N 1
SFX 4257 0 ünde .
SFX 4256 N 1
SFX 4256 0 laştırdığım .
SFX 4258 N 1
SFX 4258 0 laşmasıdır .
SFX 4259 N 1
SFX 4259 0 nebilmek .
SFX 4262 N 1
SFX 4262 0 nınca .
SFX 4261 N 1
SFX 4261 0 lemeyince .
SFX 4260 N 1
SFX 4260 0 tılacaktı .
SFX 4263 N 1
SFX 4263 0 tenleri .
SFX 4264 N 1
SFX 4264 0 lendiğimiz .
SFX 4265 N 1
SFX 4265 0 ilemeyişinden .
SFX 4267 N 1
SFX 4267 0 tenlere .
SFX 4266 N 1
SFX 4266 0 leştirilmeyeceği .
SFX 4268 N 1
SFX 4268 0 mediğinin .
SFX 4269 N 1
SFX 4269 0 maktaymış .
SFX 4270 N 1
SFX 4270 0 cenin .
SFX 4271 N 1
SFX 4271 0 ılmayabilir .
SFX 4272 N 1
SFX 4272 0 leyin .
SFX 4273 N 1
SFX 4273 0 nılabileceği .
SFX 4274 N 1
SFX 4274 0 leyip .
SFX 4275 N 1
SFX 4275 0 leyeceklerdir .
SFX 4278 N 1
SFX 4278 0 ünce .
SFX 4277 N 1
SFX 4277 0 ıklığıdır .
SFX 4276 N 1
SFX 4276 0 tabilmeyi .
SFX 4279 N 1
SFX 4279 0 emesin .
SFX 4280 N 1
SFX 4280 0 süzler .
SFX 4281 N 1
SFX 4281 0 nanları .
SFX 4283 N 1
SFX 4283 0 lendirildiği .
SFX 4282 N 1
SFX 4282 0 ndırılmış .
SFX 4285 N 1
SFX 4285 0 melerdir .
SFX 4284 N 1
SFX 4284 0 çığı .
SFX 4287 N 1
SFX 4287 0 icilikten .
SFX 4286 N 1
SFX 4286 0 mamazlığını .
SFX 4288 N 1
SFX 4288 0 landırmalar .
SFX 4289 N 1
SFX 4289 0 leşebileceğinden .
SFX 4290 N 1
SFX 4290 0 tılmadıklarını .
SFX 4292 N 1
SFX 4292 0 lemesinde .
SFX 4291 N 1
SFX 4291 0 nmeyerek .
SFX 4293 N 1
SFX 4293 0 enlik .
SFX 4294 N 1
SFX 4294 0 ttırmıştır .
SFX 4295 N 1
SFX 4295 0 layamayacağınız .
SFX 4297 N 1
SFX 4297 0 ılmalarıyla .
SFX 4296 N 1
SFX 4296 0 nememesine .
SFX 4298 N 1
SFX 4298 0 leyebilmelidir .
SFX 4299 N 1
SFX 4299 0 lenmekteydi .
SFX 4300 N 1
SFX 4300 0 leyemeyerek .
SFX 4301 N 1
SFX 4301 0 leydi .
SFX 4302 N 1
SFX 4302 0 ttuklarını .
SFX 4304 N 1
SFX 4304 0 lisinden .
SFX 4303 N 1
SFX 4303 0 layamayacağının .
SFX 4305 N 1
SFX 4305 0 lamayacaklardı .
SFX 4306 N 1
SFX 4306 0 tmadılar .
SFX 4307 N 1
SFX 4307 0 lediyseniz .
SFX 4308 N 1
SFX 4308 0 sındaki .
SFX 4310 N 1
SFX 4310 0 ebile .
SFX 4309 N 1
SFX 4309 0 leyecekse .
SFX 4311 N 1
SFX 4311 0 işemediklerinden .
SFX 4312 N 1
SFX 4312 0 ilemez .
SFX 4313 N 1
SFX 4313 0 layabiliyorlar .
SFX 4314 N 1
SFX 4314 0 lenmemişti .
SFX 4315 N 1
SFX 4315 0 lanamıyorsa .
SFX 4316 N 1
SFX 4316 0 ştırdığından .
SFX 4317 N 1
SFX 4317 0 şmasın .
SFX 4318 N 1
SFX 4318 0 leştirilmek .
SFX 4320 N 1
SFX 4320 0 işemediğini .
SFX 4319 N 1
SFX 4319 0 lanacağınız .
SFX 4323 N 1
SFX 4323 0 ınki .
SFX 4322 N 1
SFX 4322 0 leyecekti .
SFX 4321 N 1
SFX 4321 0 ıcılıklar .
SFX 4324 N 1
SFX 4324 0 latmaların .
SFX 4325 N 1
SFX 4325 0 ştıranın .
SFX 4326 N 1
SFX 4326 0 lediğine .
SFX 4329 N 1
SFX 4329 0 undaydık .
SFX 4328 N 1
SFX 4328 0 emiyorsam .
SFX 4327 N 1
SFX 4327 0 lanamıyorum .
SFX 4330 N 1
SFX 4330 0 emiyorsan .
SFX 4331 N 1
SFX 4331 0 latmadığı .
SFX 4337 N 1
SFX 4337 0 lanacağının .
SFX 4336 N 1
SFX 4336 0 sızım .
SFX 4335 N 1
SFX 4335 0 undaydım .
SFX 4334 N 1
SFX 4334 0 leştirilmesin .
SFX 4333 N 1
SFX 4333 0 emiyorsak .
SFX 4332 N 1
SFX 4332 0 laşabildiklerine .
SFX 4338 N 1
SFX 4338 0 sızın .
SFX 4340 N 1
SFX 4340 0 ındı .
SFX 4339 N 1
SFX 4339 0 laşabilirim .
SFX 4341 N 1
SFX 4341 0 lanamıyoruz .
SFX 4342 N 1
SFX 4342 0 amalar .
SFX 4344 N 1
SFX 4344 0 'indeki .
SFX 4343 N 1
SFX 4343 0 lediğimi .
SFX 4345 N 1
SFX 4345 0 ecekmişiz .
SFX 4346 N 1
SFX 4346 0 abiliyorsun .
SFX 4347 N 1
SFX 4347 0 laşabiliriz .
SFX 4350 N 1
SFX 4350 0 iğinden .
SFX 4349 N 1
SFX 4349 0 tabileceğiniz .
SFX 4348 N 1
SFX 4348 0 nmeseydi .
SFX 4351 N 1
SFX 4351 0 teceklerdi .
SFX 4353 N 1
SFX 4353 0 ışacağını .
SFX 4352 N 1
SFX 4352 0 tmanızı .
SFX 4354 N 1
SFX 4354 0 liyorlarmış .
SFX 4355 N 1
SFX 4355 0 melerden .
SFX 4358 N 1
SFX 4358 0 ciği .
SFX 4357 N 1
SFX 4357 0 landırıyorlar .
SFX 4356 N 1
SFX 4356 0 tirsiniz .
SFX 4359 N 1
SFX 4359 0 irlermiş .
SFX 4361 N 1
SFX 4361 0 laşabildiklerini .
SFX 4360 N 1
SFX 4360 0 yamadınız .
SFX 4363 N 1
SFX 4363 0 leştirilmez .
SFX 4362 N 1
SFX 4362 0 lanamamasıdır .
SFX 4366 N 1
SFX 4366 0 leyen .
SFX 4365 N 1
SFX 4365 0 ecekmişim .
SFX 4364 N 1
SFX 4364 0 ciğe .
SFX 4367 N 1
SFX 4367 0 tamıyorsanız .
SFX 4369 N 1
SFX 4369 0 mızı .
SFX 4368 N 1
SFX 4368 0 latılırsa .
SFX 4370 N 1
SFX 4370 0 lediğini .
SFX 4371 N 1
SFX 4371 0 culuklarının .
SFX 4373 N 1
SFX 4373 0 ıldın .
SFX 4372 N 1
SFX 4372 0 ününki .
SFX 4376 N 1
SFX 4376 0 ndirdiğini .
SFX 4375 N 1
SFX 4375 0 lamamışken .
SFX 4374 N 1
SFX 4374 0 laşmasaydı .
SFX 4378 N 1
SFX 4378 0 abiliyorsunuz .
SFX 4377 N 1
SFX 4377 0 ştılar .
SFX 4380 N 1
SFX 4380 0 ıldım .
SFX 4379 N 1
SFX 4379 0 ılamamasına .
SFX 4382 N 1
SFX 4382 0 amadılar .
SFX 4381 N 1
SFX 4381 0 ıştırıldığı .
SFX 4384 N 1
SFX 4384 0 ıldık .
SFX 4383 N 1
SFX 4383 0 nuzun .
SFX 4385 N 1
SFX 4385 0 sallaştırma .
SFX 4386 N 1
SFX 4386 0 amadıklarınız .
SFX 4387 N 1
SFX 4387 0 ıverirler .
SFX 4389 N 1
SFX 4389 0 ndirdiğine .
SFX 4388 N 1
SFX 4388 0 tilenler .
SFX 4390 N 1
SFX 4390 0 latsın .
SFX 4391 N 1
SFX 4391 0 leşelim .
SFX 4392 N 1
SFX 4392 0 ışacağına .
SFX 4394 N 1
SFX 4394 0 dirilmelidir .
SFX 4393 N 1
SFX 4393 0 sındaydılar .
SFX 4395 N 1
SFX 4395 0 nilme .
SFX 4396 N 1
SFX 4396 0 amadıklarının .
SFX 4397 N 1
SFX 4397 0 tırsınlar .
SFX 4398 N 1
SFX 4398 0 ündü .
SFX 4400 N 1
SFX 4400 0 laşacaksınız .
SFX 4399 N 1
SFX 4399 0 duramaz .
SFX 4401 N 1
SFX 4401 0 ınla .
SFX 4402 N 1
SFX 4402 0 ştiklerinden .
SFX 4403 N 1
SFX 4403 0 şırsın .
SFX 4405 N 1
SFX 4405 0 ecekler .
SFX 4404 N 1
SFX 4404 0 tiriyorlardı .
SFX 4407 N 1
SFX 4407 0 seymiş .
SFX 4406 N 1
SFX 4406 0 düğüdür .
SFX 4408 N 1
SFX 4408 0 direbileceği .
SFX 4409 N 1
SFX 4409 0 dirilmemiş .
SFX 4410 N 1
SFX 4410 0 dürebilecek .
SFX 4412 N 1
SFX 4412 0 layanlardan .
SFX 4411 N 1
SFX 4411 0 sızız .
SFX 4413 N 1
SFX 4413 0 lılığıdır .
SFX 4414 N 1
SFX 4414 0 ünle .
SFX 4416 N 1
SFX 4416 0 amazlığını .
SFX 4415 N 1
SFX 4415 0 ılmayışını .
SFX 4417 N 1
SFX 4417 0 leşebilsin .
SFX 4418 N 1
SFX 4418 0 yemezlerdi .
SFX 4419 N 1
SFX 4419 0 yememelerine .
SFX 4420 N 1
SFX 4420 0 tmalarının .
SFX 4421 N 1
SFX 4421 0 dıranların .
SFX 4422 N 1
SFX 4422 0 cik .
SFX 4423 N 1
SFX 4423 0 cim .
SFX 4424 N 1
SFX 4424 0 dırılmazsa .
SFX 4425 N 1
SFX 4425 0 abileceğimi .
SFX 4426 N 1
SFX 4426 0 dırmalarını .
SFX 4428 N 1
SFX 4428 0 tamayınca .
SFX 4427 N 1
SFX 4427 0 ülebilmeli .
SFX 4429 N 1
SFX 4429 0 tabilirsiniz .
SFX 4430 N 1
SFX 4430 0 abileceğime .
SFX 4431 N 1
SFX 4431 0 cin .
SFX 4433 N 1
SFX 4433 0 sızmış .
SFX 4432 N 1
SFX 4432 0 lendirilince .
SFX 4434 N 1
SFX 4434 0 iklikleri .
SFX 4435 N 1
SFX 4435 0 yabiliyormuş .
SFX 4436 N 1
SFX 4436 0 mayacak .
SFX 4437 N 1
SFX 4437 0 lemesinin .
SFX 4438 N 1
SFX 4438 0 yabildiniz .
SFX 4440 N 1
SFX 4440 0 saydılar .
SFX 4439 N 1
SFX 4439 0 ümüyle .
SFX 4442 N 1
SFX 4442 0 lukmuş .
SFX 4441 N 1
SFX 4441 0 ilsinler .
SFX 4443 N 1
SFX 4443 0 üklüğünden .
SFX 4444 N 1
SFX 4444 0 meliydiniz .
SFX 4445 N 1
SFX 4445 0 ınmaz .
SFX 4446 N 1
SFX 4446 0 ıyormuşsun .
SFX 4447 N 1
SFX 4447 0 amayacakları .
SFX 4448 N 1
SFX 4448 0 cıydım .
SFX 4450 N 1
SFX 4450 0 abileceğini .
SFX 4449 N 1
SFX 4449 0 ştırmakta .
SFX 4451 N 1
SFX 4451 0 tılacaksa .
SFX 4452 N 1
SFX 4452 0 laşabiliyorsunuz .
SFX 4454 N 1
SFX 4454 0 abileceğine .
SFX 4453 N 1
SFX 4453 0 dürdükleri .
SFX 4455 N 1
SFX 4455 0 meyişiyle .
SFX 4456 N 1
SFX 4456 0 nişlerini .
SFX 4457 N 1
SFX 4457 0 nıldı .
SFX 4458 N 1
SFX 4458 0 larınızı .
SFX 4459 N 1
SFX 4459 0 tirme .
SFX 4460 N 1
SFX 4460 0 nemeyen .
SFX 4461 N 1
SFX 4461 0 ınacağına .
SFX 4462 N 1
SFX 4462 0 şamayacağınız .
